District of Columbia statutes.
22-1314.01

Definitions.

For the purpose of § 22-1314.02, the term:

(1)

“Health professional” means a person licensed to practice a health occupation in the District pursuant to § 3-1201.01.

(2)

“Medical facility” includes a hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other facility that provides health or surgical services.

(3)

“Person” shall not include:

(A)

The chief medical officer of the medical facility or his or her designee;

(B)

The chief executive officer of the medical facility or his or her designee;

(C)

An agent of the medical facility; or

(D)

A law enforcement officer in the performance of his or her official duty.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 322, ch. 320, § 11a
as added Sept. 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-157, § 2, 43 DCR 3699

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1114.1.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Interference with Medical Facilities and Health Professionals Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-306, July 26, 1996, 43 DCR 4205).